New Jersey, session 222, A2876.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  If a choice district experiences a reduction in State school aid during any school year due to the provisions of section 4 of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-68), then notwithstanding any limitation otherwise established by the Commissioner of Education, the choice district may increase enrollment in its choice program, subject to the limitations set forth in subsection b. of this section.  The choice district shall receive school choice aid, pursuant to section 20 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-62), for each additional student that enrolls in the choice program as a result of this section. b.    When a choice district increases its choice program enrollment pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the enrollment increase shall not exceed the number of students necessary to generate an increase in school choice aid sufficient to offset the reductions in State school aid that resulted from the provisions of section 4 of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-68). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.